Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6319.31
Lead-contaminated soil, defined.

Lead-contaminated soil means bare soil on residential real property or on the property of a child-occupied facility that contains lead at or in excess of levels identified by the department.

Laws 1999, LB 863, § 33;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 660.